Utah statutes.
78B-18-106.   Form of unsworn declaration.
An unsworn declaration under this chapter must be in substantially the
following form:
I declare under penalty of perjury under the law of Utah that the foregoing is
true and correct, and that I am physically located outside the geographic
boundaries of the United States, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, and any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction
of the United States.
Executed on the ___ day of ______, _____, at ___________________________,
__________ .
(date)            (month) (year)       (city or other location, and state)
(country)
________________________
        (printed name)
________________________
          (signature)
